Utah statutes.
77-18-9.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Administrative finding" means a decision upon a question of fact reached
by an administrative agency following an administrative hearing or other
procedure satisfying the requirements of due process.
(2)  "Certificate of eligibility" means a document issued by the division
stating that the criminal record which is the subject of a petition for
expungement is eligible for expungement.
(3)  "Conviction" means judgment by a criminal court on a verdict or finding
of guilty after trial, a plea of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere.
(4)  "Division" means the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services
Division of the Department of Public Safety established in Section 53-10-103.
(5)  "Expungement" means the sealing or destruction of a criminal record,
including records of the investigation, arrest, detention, or conviction of
the petitioner.
(6)  "Jurisdiction" means an area of authority.
(7)  "Petitioner" means a person seeking expungement under this chapter.
(8)  Second degree forcible felony includes:
(a)  aggravated assault, if the person intentionally causes serious bodily
injury;
(b)  aggravated assault by a prisoner;
(c)  aggravated assault on school premises;
(d)  intentional child abuse;
(e)  criminally negligent automobile homicide;
(f)  reckless child abuse homicide;
(g)  mayhem;
(h)  manslaughter;
(i)  kidnaping;
(j)  forcible sexual abuse;
(k)  robbery;
(l)  felony fleeing causing death or serious bodily injury; or
(m)  delivery of an explosive to a common carrier.
